tests/cases.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
      App: hfst-lookup
      Gen: ../tyv.autogen.hfst
      Morph: ../tyv.automorf.hfst

Tests:

 "Noun хая ":
    хая<n><nom> : хая
    хая<n><attr> : хая
    хая<n><gen> : хаяның
    хая<n><dat> : хаяга
    хая<n><acc> : хаяны
    хая<n><loc> : хаяда
    хая<n><abl> : хаядан
    хая<n><all> : хаяже
    хая<n><pl><nom> : хаялар
    хая<n><pl><gen> : хаяларның
    хая<n><pl><dat> : хаяларга
    хая<n><pl><acc> : хаяларны
    хая<n><pl><loc> : хаяларда
    хая<n><pl><abl> : хаялардан
    хая<n><pl><all> : хаяларже

 "Noun теве ":
    теве<n><nom> : теве
    теве<n><attr> : теве
    теве<n><gen> : тевениң
    теве<n><dat> : тевеге
    теве<n><acc> : тевени
    теве<n><loc> : теведе
    теве<n><abl> : теведен
    теве<n><all> : тевеже
    теве<n><pl><nom> : тевелер
    теве<n><pl><gen> : тевелерниң
    теве<n><pl><dat> : тевелерге
    теве<n><pl><acc> : тевелерни
    теве<n><pl><loc> : тевелерде
    теве<n><pl><abl> : тевелерден
    теве<n><pl><all> : тевелерже

 "Noun хову ":
    хову<n><nom> : хову
    хову<n><attr> : хову
    хову<n><gen> : ховунуң
    хову<n><dat> : ховуга
    хову<n><acc> : ховуну
    хову<n><loc> : ховуда
    хову<n><abl> : ховудан
    хову<n><all> : ховуже
    хову<n><pl><nom> : ховулар
    хову<n><pl><gen> : ховуларның
    хову<n><pl><dat> : ховуларга
    хову<n><pl><acc> : ховуларны
    хову<n><pl><loc> : ховуларда
    хову<n><pl><abl> : ховулардан
    хову<n><pl><all> : ховуларже

 "Noun бөрү ":
    бөрү<n><nom> : бөрү
    бөрү<n><attr> : бөрү
    бөрү<n><gen> : бөрүнүң
    бөрү<n><dat> : бөрүге
    бөрү<n><acc> : бөрүнү
    бөрү<n><loc> : бөрүде
    бөрү<n><abl> : бөрүден
    бөрү<n><all> : бөрүже
    бөрү<n><pl><nom> : бөрүлер
    бөрү<n><pl><gen> : бөрүлерниң
    бөрү<n><pl><dat> : бөрүлерге
    бөрү<n><pl><acc> : бөрүлерни
    бөрү<n><pl><loc> : бөрүлерде
    бөрү<n><pl><abl> : бөрүлерден
    бөрү<n><pl><all> : бөрүлерже

 "Noun хады ":
    хады<n><nom> : хады
    хады<n><attr> : хады
    хады<n><gen> : хадының
    хады<n><dat> : хадыга
    хады<n><acc> : хадыны
    хады<n><loc> : хадыда
    хады<n><abl> : хадыдан
    хады<n><all> : хадыже
    хады<n><pl><nom> : хадылар
    хады<n><pl><gen> : хадыларның
    хады<n><pl><dat> : хадыларга
    хады<n><pl><acc> : хадыларны
    хады<n><pl><loc> : хадыларда
    хады<n><pl><abl> : хадылардан
    хады<n><pl><all> : хадыларже

 "Noun иви ":
    иви<n><nom> : иви
    иви<n><attr> : иви
    иви<n><gen> : ивиниң
    иви<n><dat> : ивиге
    иви<n><acc> : ивини
    иви<n><loc> : ивиде
    иви<n><abl> : ивиден
    иви<n><all> : ивиже
    иви<n><pl><nom> : ивилер
    иви<n><pl><gen> : ивилерниң
    иви<n><pl><dat> : ивилерге
    иви<n><pl><acc> : ивилерни
    иви<n><pl><loc> : ивилерде
    иви<n><pl><abl> : ивилерден
    иви<n><pl><all> : ивилерже

 "Noun даг ":
    даг<n><nom> : даг
    даг<n><attr> : даг
    даг<n><gen> : дагның
    даг<n><dat> : дагга
    даг<n><acc> : дагны
    даг<n><loc> : дагда
    даг<n><abl> : дагдан
    даг<n><all> : дагже
    даг<n><pl><nom> : даглар
    даг<n><pl><gen> : дагларның
    даг<n><pl><dat> : дагларга
    даг<n><pl><acc> : дагларны
    даг<n><pl><loc> : дагларда
    даг<n><pl><abl> : даглардан
    даг<n><pl><all> : дагларже


 "Noun ном ":
    ном<n><nom> : ном
    ном<n><attr> : ном
    ном<n><gen> : номнуң
    ном<n><dat> : номга
    ном<n><acc> : номну
    ном<n><loc> : номда
    ном<n><abl> : номдан
    ном<n><all> : номче
    ном<n><pl><nom> : номнар
    ном<n><pl><gen> : номнарның
    ном<n><pl><dat> : номнарга
    ном<n><pl><acc> : номнарны
    ном<n><pl><loc> : номнарда
    ном<n><pl><abl> : номнардан
    ном<n><pl><all> : номнарже

 "Noun мал ":
    мал<n><nom> : мал
    мал<n><attr> : мал
    мал<n><gen> : малдың
    мал<n><dat> : малга
    мал<n><acc> : малды
    мал<n><loc> : малда
    мал<n><abl> : малдан
    мал<n><all> : малче
    мал<n><pl><nom> : малдар
    мал<n><pl><gen> : малдарның
    мал<n><pl><dat> : малдарга
    мал<n><pl><acc> : малдарны
    мал<n><pl><loc> : малдарда
    мал<n><pl><abl> : малдардан
    мал<n><pl><all> : малдарже


 "Noun хөл ":
    хөл<n><nom> : хөл
    хөл<n><attr> : хөл
    хөл<n><gen> : хөлдүң
    хөл<n><dat> : хөлге
    хөл<n><acc> : хөлдү
    хөл<n><loc> : хөлде
    хөл<n><abl> : хөлден
    хөл<n><all> : хөлче
    хөл<n><pl><nom> : хөлдер
    хөл<n><pl><gen> : хөлдерниң
    хөл<n><pl><dat> : хөлдерге
    хөл<n><pl><acc> : хөлдерни
    хөл<n><pl><loc> : хөлдерде
    хөл<n><pl><abl> : хөлдерден
    хөл<n><pl><all> : хөлдерже


 "Noun аът ":
    аът<n><nom> : аът
    аът<n><attr> : аът
    аът<n><gen> : аъттың
    аът<n><dat> : аътка
    аът<n><acc> : аътты
    аът<n><loc> : аътта
    аът<n><abl> : аъттан
    аът<n><all> : аътче
    аът<n><pl><nom> : аъттар
    аът<n><pl><gen> : аъттарның
    аът<n><pl><dat> : аъттарга
    аът<n><pl><acc> : аъттарны
    аът<n><pl><loc> : аъттарда
    аът<n><pl><abl> : аъттардан
    аът<n><pl><all> : аъттарже

 "Noun чаъс ":
    чаъс<n><nom> : чаъс
    чаъс<n><attr> : чаъс
    чаъс<n><gen> : чаъстың
    чаъс<n><dat> : чаъска
    чаъс<n><acc> : чаъсты
    чаъс<n><loc> : чаъста
    чаъс<n><abl> : чаъстан
    чаъс<n><all> : чаъсче
    чаъс<n><pl><nom> : чаъстар
    чаъс<n><pl><gen> : чаъстарның
    чаъс<n><pl><dat> : чаъстарга
    чаъс<n><pl><acc> : чаъстарны
    чаъс<n><pl><loc> : чаъстарда
    чаъс<n><pl><abl> : чаъстардан
    чаъс<n><pl><all> : чаъстарже

 "Noun эът ":
    эът<n><nom> : эът
    эът<n><attr> : эът
    эът<n><gen> : эъттиң
    эът<n><dat> : эътке
    эът<n><acc> : эътти
    эът<n><loc> : эътте
    эът<n><abl> : эъттен
    эът<n><all> : эътче
    эът<n><pl><nom> : эъттер
    эът<n><pl><gen> : эъттерниң
    эът<n><pl><dat> : эъттерге
    эът<n><pl><acc> : эъттерни
    эът<n><pl><loc> : эъттерде
    эът<n><pl><abl> : эъттерден
    эът<n><pl><all> : эъттерже

 "Noun инек ":
    инек<n><nom> : инек
    инек<n><attr> : инек
    инек<n><gen> : инектиң
    инек<n><dat> : инекке
    инек<n><acc> : инекти
    инек<n><loc> : инекте
    инек<n><abl> : инектен
    инек<n><all> : инекче
    инек<n><pl><nom> : инектер
    инек<n><pl><gen> : инектерниң
    инек<n><pl><dat> : инектерге
    инек<n><pl><acc> : инектерни
    инек<n><pl><loc> : инектерде
    инек<n><pl><abl> : инектерден
    инек<n><pl><all> : инектерже

 "Noun бөрт ":
    бөрт<n><nom> : бөрт
    бөрт<n><attr> : бөрт
    бөрт<n><gen> : бөрттүң
    бөрт<n><dat> : бөртке
    бөрт<n><acc> : бөрттү
    бөрт<n><loc> : бөртте
    бөрт<n><abl> : бөрттен
    бөрт<n><all> : бөртче
    бөрт<n><pl><nom> : бөрттер
    бөрт<n><pl><gen> : бөрттерниң
    бөрт<n><pl><dat> : бөрттерге
    бөрт<n><pl><acc> : бөрттерни
    бөрт<n><pl><loc> : бөрттерде
    бөрт<n><pl><abl> : бөрттерден
    бөрт<n><pl><all> : бөрттерже



 "Noun аас ":
    аас<n><nom> : аас
    аас<n><attr> : аас
    аас<n><gen> : аастың
    аас<n><dat> : ааска
    аас<n><acc> : аасты
    аас<n><loc> : ааста
    аас<n><abl> : аастан
    аас<n><all> : аасче
    аас<n><pl><nom> : аастар
    аас<n><pl><gen> : аастарның
    аас<n><pl><dat> : аастарга
    аас<n><pl><acc> : аастарны
    аас<n><pl><loc> : аастарда
    аас<n><pl><abl> : аастардан
    аас<n><pl><all> : аастарже


 "Noun оол ":
    оол<n><nom> : оол
    оол<n><attr> : оол
    оол<n><gen> : оолдуң
    оол<n><dat> : оолга
    оол<n><acc> : оолду
    оол<n><loc> : оолда
    оол<n><abl> : оолдан
    оол<n><all> : оолче
    оол<n><pl><nom> : оолдар
    оол<n><pl><gen> : оолдарның
    оол<n><pl><dat> : оолдарга
    оол<n><pl><acc> : оолдарны
    оол<n><pl><loc> : оолдарда
    оол<n><pl><abl> : оолдардан
    оол<n><pl><all> : оолдарже

 "Noun сад":
    сад<n><nom> : сад
    сад<n><attr> : сад
    сад<n><loc> : садта
    сад<n><abl> : садтан
    сад<n><pl><nom> : садтар
    сад<n><pl><gen> : садтарның
    сад<n><pl><dat> : садтарга
    сад<n><pl><acc> : садтарны
    сад<n><pl><loc> : садтарда
    сад<n><pl><abl> : садтардан
    сад<n><pl><all> : садтарже

 "Noun совхоз":
    совхоз<n><nom> : совхоз
    совхоз<n><attr> : совхоз
    совхоз<n><gen> : совхозтуң
    совхоз<n><dat> : совхозка
    совхоз<n><loc> : совхозта
    совхоз<n><pl><nom> : совхозтар

 "Noun фестиваль":
    фестиваль<n><all> : фестивальче

 "Noun ансамбль":
    ансамбль<n><px3sp><gen> : ансамблиниң

 "Noun роль":
    роль<n><nom> : роль
    роль<n><attr> : роль
    роль<n><acc> : рольду

 "Noun медаль":
    медаль<n><nom> : медаль
    медаль<n><attr> : медаль
    медаль<n><gen> : медальдың
    медаль<n><dat> : медальга
    медаль<n><acc> : медальды
    медаль<n><abl> : медальдан
    медаль<n><pl><nom> : медальдар

 "Noun рубль":
    рубль<n><nom> : рубль
    рубль<n><attr> : рубль
    рубль<n><gen> : рубльдиң
    рубль<n><dat> : рубльге
    рубль<n><acc> : рубльди
    рубль<n><abl> : рубльден
    рубль<n><pl><nom> : рубльдер

 "Noun комплекс": 
    комплекс<n><nom> : комплекс
    комплекс<n><attr> : комплекс
    комплекс<n><gen> : комплекстиң
    комплекс<n><acc> : комплексти
    комплекс<n><pl><nom> : комплекстер

 "Noun область": 
    область<n><nom> : область
    область<n><attr> : область
    область<n><gen> : областың
    область<n><dat> : обласка
    область<n><abl> : областан
    область<n><all> : обласче
    область<n><loc> : областа
    область<n><acc> : областы
    область<n><pl><nom> : областар
    область<n><pl><abl> : областардан
